Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6136
Production of records.

The director shall have the power to order production of any records, books, or other information and papers in the possession of a mutual insurance holding company or its affiliates as are reasonably necessary to ascertain the financial condition of the reorganized stock insurer or to determine compliance with Chapter 44.

Laws 1997, LB 740, § 15.